el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Αξεσουάρ μεταφοράς μωρών > Αξεσουάρ για μάρσιπους: Σαλιάρες για μάρσιπους; Καλύμματα για μάρσιπους; Κουκούλες για μάρσιπους; Τσάντες αποθήκευσης για μάρσιπους; Επιθέματα οδοντοφυΐας για μάρσιπους; Προεκτάσεις ζώνης μέσης για μάρσιπους
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴幼儿出行用品配件 > 婴儿背带配件: 婴儿背带围兜; 婴儿背带套; 婴儿背带兜帽; 婴儿背带收纳袋; 婴儿背带磨牙垫; 婴儿背带腰带延长器
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Taşıma Aksesuarları > Kanguru Aksesuarları: Kanguru Önlükler; Kanguru Kılıfları; Kanguru Başlıkları; Kanguru Saklama Torbaları; Kanguru Diş Çıkarma Pedleri; Kanguru Kemer Uzatıcıları
ko: 영유아 > 영유아용 캐리어 부대용품 > 아기띠 부대용품: 아기띠 턱받이; 아기띠 커버; 아기띠 후드; 아기띠 보관 가방; 아기띠 침받이; 아기띠용 허리띠
nb: Baby og barn > Tilbehør for babytransport > Tilbehør for bæreseler: Bæreselesmekker; Bæreseletrekk; Bæreselehetter; Oppbevaringsposer for bæresele; Bæresele-biteputer; Midjebåndforlengere for bæreseler
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires de transport pour bébés > Accessoires pour porte-bébés: Bavoirs de porte-bébés; Housses de porte-bébés; Housse de porte-bébé; Sacs de rangement pour porte-bébés; Coussinets de dentition pour porte-bébés; Rallonges de ceinture pour porte-bébés
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Acessórios de transporte para bebé > Acessórios de transportadoras de bebé: Babete para porta-bebé; Capas para porta-bebé; Tampa para porta-bebé; Malas de armazenamento para porta-bebé; Almofadas de dentição para porta-bebé; Extensores de cintura para porta-bebé
sv: Baby och småbarn > Tillbehör till barntransport > Tillbehör till bärselar: Bärselehaklappar; Bärselskydd; Bärselesluvor; Förvaringsväskor för bärsele; Bärselesbitkuddar; Midjebandsförlängare för bärsele
sk-SK: Bábätká > Príslušenstvo na prepravu detí > Príslušenstvo k detským nosičom: Podbradníky k detským nosičom; Poťahy na detské nosiče; Kukly k detským nosičom; Tašky na detské nosiče; Polstrovanie na detské nosiče; Predlžovacie pásy na detské nosiče
da: Baby og småbørn > Babytransport – tilbehør > Babybæreseler – tilbehør: Bæreselesutter; Bæreselebetræk; Bæreselehætter; Opbevaringstasker til bæreseler; Bæreselebidepuder; Bæreseleforlængere
nl: Baby en peuter > Accessoires voor vervoeren van baby's > Accessoires voor babyvervoer: Slabbetjes voor babyvervoer; Hoezen voor babyvervoer; Kappen voor babyvervoer; Opbergtassen voor babyvervoer; Bijtpads voor babyvervoer; Taillebandverlengers voor babyvervoer
ru: Товары для детей > Аксессуары для детских автокресел, переносок и колясок > Аксессуары для детских переносок: Слюнявчики для детских переносок; Чехлы для детских переносок; Капюшоны для детских переносок; Сумки для хранения детских переносок; Накладки для прорезывания зубов для детских переносок; Удлинители пояса для детских переносок
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用外出小物 > 抱っこひも関連用品: 抱っこ紐よだれかけ; 抱っこ紐カバー; 抱っこ紐フード; 抱っこ紐収納袋; 抱っこ紐歯固めパッド; 抱っこ紐ウエストバンドエクステンダー
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių transportavimo priemonių priedai > Kūdikių nešynių priedai: Seilinukai nešynėms; Kūdikių nešynių gaubtai; Kūdikių nešynių gobtuvai; Kūdikių nešynių laikymo krepšiai; Kramtymo pagalvėlės Kūdikių nešynėms; Kūdikių nešynių juosmens ilgintuvai
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přeprava dětí – příslušenství > Doplňky k nosítkům pro děti: Bryndáky k nosítkům pro děti; Potahy k nosítkům pro děti; Stříšky k nosítkům pro děti; Úložné tašky k nosítkům pro děti; Chrániče ramenních popruhů k nosítkům pro děti; Prodlužovací pásy k nosítkům pro děti
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Pribor za prijevoz beba > Dodaci za nosiljke za bebe: Podbradnici za nosiljke za bebe; Prekrivači za nosiljke za bebe; Kapuljače za nosiljke za bebe; Torbe za pohranu nosiljki; Jastučići za grickanje za nosiljke; Produžeci pojasa za nosiljku za bebe
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Akcesoria do transportu niemowląt > Akcesoria do nosidełek dla niemowląt: Śliniaki do nosidełek; Pokrowce na nosidełka; Kaptury do nosidełek; Torby do przechowywania nosidełek; Wkładki do nosidełka dla ząbkujących niemowląt; Przedłużacze pasa do nosidełka
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Бебешки транспортни аксесоари > Аксесоари за бебеносещи средства: Лигавници за бебеносещи средства; Покривала за бебеносещи средства; Качулки за бебеносещи средства; Чанти за съхранение на бебеносещи средства; Подложки за поникващи зъби за бебеносещи средства; Удължители за колан за бебе
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Accesorios para el transporte de bebés > Accesorios para cargadores de bebés: Baberos para portabebés; Fundas para portabebés; Capuchas para portabebés; Bolsas de almacenamiento para portabebés; Almohadillas de dentición para portabebés; Extensores de cintura para portabebés
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Babaszállítási kiegészítők > Babahordozó-kiegészítők: Babahordozó-előkék; Babahordozó-huzatok; Babahordozó-kapucnik; Babahordozó tárolótáskák; Babahordozó rágókapárnák; Babahordozó derékpánt-hosszabbítók
pt-BR: Infantil > Acessórios para transporte de bebês > Acessórios para cangurus: Babadores para cangurus; Capas para cangurus; Capuzes para cangurus; Sacos de armazenamento para cangurus; Almofadas de dentição para cangurus; Extensores de cintura para cangurus
it: Bebè e bimbi > Accessori trasporto bebè > Accessori marsupio: Bavaglini per marsupio; Copertine per marsupio; Cappucci per marsupio; Borse portaoggetti per marsupio; Cuscinetti per la dentizione per marsupio; Estensori per cintura per marsupio
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์เคลื่อนย้ายเด็กอ่อน > อุปกรณ์เคลื่อนย้ายเด็กทารก: เป้อุ้มเด็กแบบมีผ้ากันเปื้อน; ผ้าคลุมที่อุ้มเด็ก; เป้อุ้มเด็กแบบฮู้ด; เป้อุ้มเด็กแบบใส่ของ; เป้อุ้มเด็กแบบป้องกันฟัน; เป้อุ้มเด็กแบบคาดเอว
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒外出用品配件 > 嬰兒背巾配件: 嬰兒背巾圍兜; 嬰兒背巾套; 嬰兒背巾連帽; 嬰兒背巾收納袋; 嬰兒背巾口水墊; 嬰兒背巾腕帶延長扣
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dodatki za prevoz otrok > Dodatki za otroške nosilke: Slinčki za otroške nosilke; Prevleke za otroške nosilke; Strešice za otroške nosilke; Vrečke za shranjevanje otroških nosilk; Prevleke za grizala za otroške nosilke; Podaljški za pas za otroške nosilke
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Accesorii pentru transportul bebelușilor > Accesorii pentru marsupiu: Bavete pentru marsupiu; Huse pentru marsupiu; Glugi pentru marsupiu; Genți de depozitare pentru marsupiu; Accesorii dentiție pentru marsupiu; Extensii pentru talie pentru marsupiu
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babytransportzubehör > Zubehör für Babyträger: Lätzchen für Babytragen; Bezüge für Babytragen; Hauben für Babytragen; Aufbewahrungstaschen für Babytragen; Babytrage-Beißspielzeuge; Gurtverlängerungen für Babytragen
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Transport Accessories > Baby Carrier Accessories: Baby Carrier Bibs; Baby Carrier Covers; Baby Carrier Hoods; Baby Carrier Storage Bags; Baby Carrier Teething Pads; Baby Carrier Waistband Extenders
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Xe đẩy trẻ em > Phụ kiện địu bé: Yếm địu bé; Bọc địu bé; Mũ trùm địu bé; Túi đựng đồ địu bé; Miếng đệm gặm nướu cho địu bé; Kẹp cài điều chỉnh thắt lưng địu bé
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan kuljetustarvikkeet > Vauvan kantolaitteen lisävarusteet: Vauvan kantolaitteen ruokalaput; Vauvan kantolaitteen suojat; Vauvan kantolaitteen huput; Vauvan kantolaitteen säilytyspussit; Vauvan kantolaitteen purutyynyt; Vauvan kantolaitteen vyötärönauhan laajentimet